Connecticut, session 2026, HB05531.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) (1) Each candidate for
presidential elector who is endorsed for nomination to such office by a
political party under section 9-388 of the general statutes, or who files a
candidacy for nomination to such office with a political party
designation under section 9-453b of the general statutes, shall execute
the following pledge: "If chosen for the office of presidential elector, I
agree to serve and to mark my electoral college ballots for the nominees
for President and Vice President of the political party by which I was
nominated.". A copy of such executed pledge shall be included in the
filing of the certificate of endorsement or candidacy for nomination, as
applicable.
(2) If a political party's nominee for President or Vice President dies
or withdraws as a candidate in accordance with such political party's
rules prior to the meeting of presidential electors under section 9-176 of
the general statutes, as amended by this act, the pledge executed under
subsection (a) of this section shall apply to such political party's
successor nominee.
(b) Each candidate for presidential elector who files a candidacy for
nomination to such office without a political party designation under
LCO 1 of 6

Substitute Bill No. 5531
section 9-453b of the general statutes, or who registers a candidacy
associated with a write-in candidate for President under subsection (b)
of section 9-175 of the general statutes, shall execute the following
pledge: "If chosen for the office of presidential elector, I agree to serve
and to mark my electoral college ballots for the candidate for President
listed on this filing and for such candidate's running mate as Vice
President.". A copy of such executed pledge shall be included in the
filing of the candidacy for nomination or the registration associated with
a write-in candidate for President, as applicable.
Sec. 2. Section 9-176 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) The presidential electors of the state shall meet at the office of the
Secretary of the State at twelve o'clock noon on the first Tuesday after
the second Wednesday of the December following their election [and]
to cast their electoral college ballots for President and Vice President, as
required by the Constitution and laws of the United States. [, shall cast
their ballots for President and Vice President. Each such elector shall
cast such elector's ballots for the candidates under whose names such
elector ran on the official election ballot, as provided in section 9-175]
The Secretary of the State shall preside over the casting of such ballots.
(b) (1) If any [such] presidential elector is absent or if there is a
vacancy in the [electoral college] presidential electors of the state for any
cause, the presidential electors present shall [, before voting for
President and Vice President, elect] choose by ballot an [elector] eligible
person to fill such vacancy, and the person so chosen shall be a
presidential elector, shall perform the duties of such office and shall cast
his or her electoral college ballots for the candidates to whom the
presidential elector that he or she is replacing was pledged.
(2) To be eligible to be chosen to fill a vacancy in the presidential
electors of the state under subdivision (1) of this subsection, a person
shall execute the following pledge: "I agree to serve and to mark my
electoral college ballots consistent with the pledge of the presidential
LCO 2 of 6

Substitute Bill No. 5531
elector who I am replacing.".
(c) The Secretary of the State shall provide to each presidential elector
the electoral college ballots for President and Vice President. Each
presidential elector shall complete such ballots by marking such ballots
with his or her votes for President and Vice President, respectively, and
affixing his or her signature and legibly printed name to such ballots.
(d) Each presidential elector shall present such completed ballots to
the Secretary of the State, who shall examine such ballots and accept as
cast each such ballot marked consistent with the pledge executed by
such presidential elector under section 1 of this act or subdivision (2) of
subsection (b) of this section, as applicable. In the case of an electoral
college ballot marked inconsistent with the pledge so executed, the
Secretary shall not accept as cast such ballot.
(e) Any presidential elector who refuses to comply with any
provision of subsection (c) or (d) of this section, or marks any electoral
college ballot inconsistent with the pledge executed by such presidential
elector under section 1 of this act or subdivision (2) of subsection (b) of
this section, shall forfeit the office of presidential elector and cause a
vacancy in the presidential electors of the state, which vacancy shall be
filled in accordance with the provisions of subdivision (1) of subsection
(b) of this section. Each time such a vacancy is so filled, the process set
forth in subsections (c) and (d) of this section shall be repeated until all
electoral college ballots of all presidential electors of the state have been
accepted as cast.
(f) After all electoral college ballots of all presidential electors of the
state have been accepted as cast, the Secretary of the State shall furnish
six duplicate originals of the certificate of ascertainment of appointment
of presidential electors previously issued and transmitted by the
Secretary pursuant to subsection (b) of section 9-315, as amended by this
act, or an amended version of such certificate prepared pursuant to
subsection (h) of this section, as applicable, to the presidential electors.
The Secretary shall then assist such presidential electors with preparing,
LCO 3 of 6

Substitute Bill No. 5531
signing and transmitting the six certificates of votes required under 3
USC Sections 9 to 11, inclusive, as amended from time to time, and
annexing to all certificates of votes the duplicate originals of the most
recent version of the certificate of ascertainment described in this
subdivision.
(g) Any presidential elector who refuses to sign any of the certificates
of votes, as provided in subsection (f) of this section, shall forfeit the
office of presidential elector and cause a vacancy in the presidential
electors of the state, which vacancy shall be filled in accordance with the
provisions of subdivision (1) of subsection (b) of this section. Each time
such a vacancy is so filled, the process set forth in subsections (c), (d)
and (f) of this section shall be repeated until all electoral college ballots
of all presidential electors of the state have been accepted as cast and all
certificates of votes have been signed by all such presidential electors.
(h) After all electoral college ballots of all presidential electors of the
state have been accepted as cast and all certificates of votes have been
100 signed by all such presidential electors, the Secretary of the State shall
101 prepare a final list of presidential electors of the state. Whenever the
102 final list of presidential electors of the state differs from the list of
103 presidential electors of the state that was included on the certificate of
104 ascertainment of appointment of presidential electors previously issued
105 and transmitted by the Secretary of the State pursuant to subsection (b)
106 of section 9-315, as amended by this act, the Secretary shall immediately
107 (1) prepare an amended certificate of ascertainment of appointment of
108 presidential electors that complies with the provisions of 3 USC 5(a)(2),
109 as amended from time to time, (2) issue such amended certificate, and
110 (3) transmit, in the most expeditious method available, such amended
111 certificate to the Archivist of the United States.
112 (i) Any presidential elector who fails to mark his or her electoral
113 college ballots consistent with the pledge he or she has executed under
114 section 1 of this act or subdivision (2) of subsection (b) of this section, as
115 applicable, shall be ineligible upon such failure and thereafter to the
116 office of presidential elector.
LCO 4 of 6

Substitute Bill No. 5531
117 Sec. 3. Section 9-315 of the general statutes is repealed and the
118 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
119 (a) The votes returned as cast for a senator in Congress,
120 representatives in Congress and presidential electors shall be publicly
121 counted by the Treasurer, Secretary of the State and Comptroller on the
122 last Wednesday of the month in which [they] such votes were cast, and
123 such votes shall be counted in conformity to any decision rendered by
124 the judges of the Supreme Court as provided in section 9-323. In
125 accordance with the count so made, they shall, on said day, declare what
126 persons are elected senators in the Congress of the United States or
127 representatives in Congress, and the Secretary of the State shall
128 forthwith notify [them] such persons by mail of their election; and,
129 except in the event that the Agreement Among the States to Elect the
130 President by National Popular Vote under section 9-175a has taken
131 effect in accordance with Article IV of said agreement, they shall declare
132 the proper number of persons having the greatest number of votes to be
133 presidential electors and, in case of an equal vote for said presidential
134 electors, shall determine by lot from the persons having such equal
135 number of votes the persons appointed, and the Secretary of the State
136 shall forthwith notify [them] such persons by mail of their appointment.
137 (b) For the purposes of the Electoral Count Reform Act of 2022, P.L.
138 117-328, Div. P, Title I, as amended from time to time, the Secretary of
139 the State shall be the executive of the state responsible for issuing a
140 certificate of ascertainment of appointment of presidential electors and,
141 immediately after such issuance, transmitting such certificate to the
142 Archivist of the United States. In preparing such certificate, the
143 Secretary shall specify in the text thereof that (1) the presidential electors
144 appointed under subsection (a) of this section will serve as such unless
145 a vacancy occurs in the presidential electors of the state before the
146 conclusion of the meeting held under section 9-176, as amended by this
147 act, in which case an eligible person shall be chosen to fill such vacancy
148 in accordance with the provisions of said section, and (2) if an eligible
149 person is chosen to fill such a vacancy, the Secretary shall issue an
150 amended certificate of ascertainment of appointment of presidential
LCO 5 of 6

Substitute Bill No. 5531
151 electors, stating the names comprising the final list of presidential
152 electors of the state, and shall transmit such amended certificate to the
153 Archivist of the United States.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026 9-176
Sec. 3 October 1, 2026 9-315
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Section 2(d), "complete his or her electoral college ballot and" was
deleted to eliminate redundant language and "such a presidential
elector's pledge" was changed to "the pledge so executed" for clarity; in
Section 2(e), ", as applicable" was deleted for accuracy; and in Section 2,
subsections (f)(1) and (2) were redesignated as subsections (f) and (g),
the remaining subsections of the section were relettered, an internal
reference to "subsection (g)" was changed to "subsection (h)" and an
internal reference to "subdivision (1) of this subsection" was changed to
"subsection (f) of this section" for clarity.
GAE Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 6 of 6